New York, session 2025-2026, A5601.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public service law is amended by adding a new section 2 66-x to read as follows: 3 § 66-x. Utility discount program. 1. (a) Notwithstanding any other 4 provision of law, the commission is authorized and directed to require a 5 gas corporation, electric corporation or municipality to establish a 6 discount program for low-income senior citizens and individuals with a 7 disability no later than ninety days after the effective date of this 8 section. Such program shall offer a yearly benefit to low-income senior 9 citizens and individuals with a disability in the form of a ten percent 10 discount on utility bills. The fiscal impact of such program shall not 11 be borne by customers and shall not be added to bills rendered by a gas 12 corporation, electric corporation or municipality to customers. 13 (b) A gas corporation, electric corporation or municipality which 14 offers such discount program shall conspicuously advertise the avail- 15 ability and amount of such discount on the website of such gas corpo- 16 ration, electric corporation or municipality. The availability and 17 amount of such discount shall also be conspicuously advertised on the 18 accessibility page of the website of such gas corporation, electric 19 corporation or municipality. 20 2. For the purposes of this section: 21 (a) "individuals with a disability" shall mean a primary named utility 22 service, water service, or telephone service accountholder (i) with a 23 disability, as defined in subdivision twenty-one of section two hundred 24 ninety-two of the executive law; and (ii) who has had a total household EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03282-01-5 A. 5601 2 1 income of less than fifty thousand dollars for the most recent two 2 consecutive income tax years beginning in two thousand twenty, as veri- 3 fied by the department of taxation and finance; and (iii) who is 4 currently receiving (A) social security disability insurance (SSDI), (B) 5 supplemental security income (SSI) benefits under the federal social 6 security act, (C) disability pension or disability compensation benefits 7 provided by the United States department of veterans affairs, (D) disa- 8 bility pension or disability compensation benefits provided by the 9 United States Postal Service, or (E) those previously eligible by virtue 10 of receiving disability benefits under the supplemental security income 11 program or the social security disability program and currently receiv- 12 ing medical assistance benefits based on determination of disability as 13 provided in section three hundred sixty-six of the social services law; 14 and 15 (b) "low-income senior citizen" shall mean a primary named utility 16 service, water service, or telephone service accountholder who (i) is at 17 least sixty-five years of age; and (ii) either (A) has had a total 18 household income of less than fifty thousand dollars for two consecutive 19 income tax years beginning in two thousand twenty, as verified by the 20 department of taxation and finance; or (B) is annually eligible to 21 receive assistance under the emergency rental assistance program (ERAP) 22 or the home energy assistance program (HEAP) and provides proof of 23 eligibility from the agency administering ERAP or HEAP. 24 § 2. The public service law is amended by adding a new section 89-q to 25 read as follows: 26 § 89-q. Water discount program. 1. (a) Notwithstanding any other 27 provision of law, the commission is authorized and directed to require 28 waterworks corporations and municipal water systems to establish a 29 discount program for low-income senior citizens and individuals with a 30 disability no later than ninety days after the effective date of this 31 section. Such program shall offer a yearly benefit to low-income senior 32 citizens and individuals with a disability in the form of a ten percent 33 discount on water utility bills. The fiscal impact of such program shall 34 not be borne by customers and shall not be added to bills rendered by a 35 waterworks corporation or municipal water system to customers. 36 (b) A waterworks corporation or municipal water system which offers 37 such discount program shall conspicuously advertise the availability and 38 amount of such discount on the website of such waterworks corporations 39 or municipal water system. The availability and amount of such discount 40 shall also be conspicuously advertised on the accessibility page of the 41 website of such waterworks corporation or municipal water system. 42 2. For the purposes of this section: 43 (a) "individuals with a disability" shall mean a primary named utility 44 service, water service, or telephone service accountholder (i) with a 45 disability, as defined in subdivision twenty-one of section two hundred 46 ninety-two of the executive law; and (ii) who has had a total household 47 income of less than fifty thousand dollars for the most recent two 48 consecutive income tax years beginning in two thousand twenty, as veri- 49 fied by the department of taxation and finance; and (iii) who is 50 currently receiving (A) social security disability insurance (SSDI), (B) 51 supplemental security income (SSI) benefits under the federal social 52 security act, (C) disability pension or disability compensation benefits 53 provided by the United States department of veterans affairs, (D) disa- 54 bility pension or disability compensation benefits provided by the 55 United States Postal Service, or (E) those previously eligible by virtue 56 of receiving disability benefits under the supplemental security income A. 5601 3 1 program or the social security disability program and currently receiv- 2 ing medical assistance benefits based on determination of disability as 3 provided in section three hundred sixty-six of the social services law; 4 and 5 (b) "low-income senior citizen" shall mean a primary named utility 6 service, water service, or telephone service accountholder who (i) is at 7 least sixty-five years of age; and (ii) either (A) has had a total 8 household income of less than fifty thousand dollars for two consecutive 9 income tax years beginning in two thousand twenty, as verified by the 10 department of taxation and finance; or (B) is annually eligible to 11 receive assistance under the emergency rental assistance program (ERAP) 12 or the home energy assistance program (HEAP) and provides proof of 13 eligibility from the agency administering ERAP or HEAP. 14 § 3. The public service law is amended by adding a new section 91-b to 15 read as follows: 16 § 91-b. Telephone discount program. 1. (a) Notwithstanding any other 17 provision of law, the commission is authorized and directed to require a 18 telephone corporation to establish a discount program for low-income 19 senior citizens and individuals with a disability no later than ninety 20 days after the effective date of this section. Such program shall offer 21 a yearly benefit to low-income senior citizens and individuals with a 22 disability in the form of a ten percent discount on telephone bills. The 23 fiscal impact of such program shall not be borne by customers and shall 24 not be added to bills rendered by a telephone corporation to customers. 25 (b) A telephone corporation which offers such discount program shall 26 conspicuously advertise the availability and amount of such discount on 27 the website of such telephone corporation. The availability and amount 28 of such discount shall also be conspicuously advertised on the accessi- 29 bility page of the website of such telephone corporation. 30 (c) Participation in the federal government's lifeline or affordable 31 connectivity program, or any successor program the commission shall deem 32 sufficient, shall satisfy the telephone corporation's obligation to 33 establish a discount program under paragraph (a) of this subdivision, 34 unless the commission deems it insufficient to satisfy such require- 35 ments. 36 (d) Before applying a discount under paragraph (a) of this subdivi- 37 sion, a telephone corporation may require proof of eligibility from the 38 primary named accountholder for the calendar year in which the discount 39 is sought. 40 2. For the purposes of this section: 41 (a) "individuals with a disability" shall mean a primary named utility 42 service, water service, or telephone service accountholder (i) with a 43 disability, as defined in subdivision twenty-one of section two hundred 44 ninety-two of the executive law; and (ii) who has had a total household 45 income of less than fifty thousand dollars for the most recent two 46 consecutive income tax years beginning in two thousand twenty, as veri- 47 fied by the department of taxation and finance; and (iii) who is 48 currently receiving (A) social security disability insurance (SSDI), (B) 49 supplemental security income (SSI) benefits under the federal social 50 security act, (C) disability pension or disability compensation benefits 51 provided by the United States department of veterans affairs, (D) disa- 52 bility pension or disability compensation benefits provided by the 53 United States Postal Service, or (E) those previously eligible by virtue 54 of receiving disability benefits under the supplemental security income 55 program or the social security disability program and currently receiv- 56 ing medical assistance benefits based on determination of disability as A. 5601 4 1 provided in section three hundred sixty-six of the social services law; 2 and 3 (b) "low-income senior citizen" shall mean a primary named telephone 4 service accountholder who (i) is at least sixty-five years of age; and 5 (ii) either (A) has had a total household income of less than fifty 6 thousand dollars for two consecutive income tax years beginning in two 7 thousand twenty, as verified by the department of taxation and finance; 8 or (B) is annually eligible to receive assistance under the emergency 9 rental assistance program (ERAP) or the home energy assistance program 10 (HEAP) and provides proof of eligibility from the agency administering 11 ERAP or HEAP. 12 § 4. The public service law is amended by adding a new section 224-d 13 to read as follows: 14 § 224-d. Cable discount program. 1. (a) Notwithstanding any other 15 provision of law, the commission is authorized and directed to require a 16 telephone corporation, as defined in subdivision seventeen of section 17 two of this chapter, and a cable television company, as defined in 18 section two hundred twelve of this article, that provides cable service 19 to customers in New York, to establish a discount program for low-income 20 senior citizens and individuals with a disability no later than ninety 21 days after the effective date of this section. Such program shall offer 22 a yearly benefit to low-income senior citizens and individuals with a 23 disability in the form of a ten percent discount on cable bills. The 24 fiscal impact of such program shall not be borne by customers and shall 25 not be added to bills rendered by a telephone corporation or cable tele- 26 vision company to customers. 27 (b) A telephone corporation or cable television company which offers 28 such discount program shall conspicuously advertise the availability and 29 amount of such discount on the website of such telephone corporation or 30 cable television company. The availability and amount of such discount 31 shall also be conspicuously advertised on the accessibility page of the 32 website of such telephone corporation or cable television company. 33 (c) Participation in the federal government's lifeline or affordable 34 connectivity program, or any successor program the commission shall deem 35 sufficient, shall satisfy the telephone corporation's or cable tele- 36 vision company's obligation to establish a discount program under para- 37 graph (a) of this subdivision, unless the commission deems it insuffi- 38 cient to satisfy such requirements. 39 (d) Before applying a discount under paragraph (a) of this subdivi- 40 sion, a telephone corporation or cable television company may require 41 proof of eligibility from the primary named accountholder for the calen- 42 dar year in which the discount is sought. 43 2. For the purposes of this section: 44 (a) "individuals with a disability" shall mean a primary named utility 45 service, water service, or telephone service accountholder (i) with a 46 disability, as defined in subdivision twenty-one of section two hundred 47 ninety-two of the executive law; and (ii) who has had a total household 48 income of less than fifty thousand dollars for the most recent two 49 consecutive income tax years beginning in two thousand twenty, as veri- 50 fied by the department of taxation and finance; and (iii) who is 51 currently receiving (A) social security disability insurance (SSDI), (B) 52 supplemental security income (SSI) benefits under the federal social 53 security act, (C) disability pension or disability compensation benefits 54 provided by the United States department of veterans affairs, (D) disa- 55 bility pension or disability compensation benefits provided by the 56 United States Postal Service, or (E) those previously eligible by virtue A. 5601 5 1 of receiving disability benefits under the supplemental security income 2 program or the social security disability program and currently receiv- 3 ing medical assistance benefits based on determination of disability as 4 provided in section three hundred sixty-six of the social services law; 5 and 6 (b) "low-income senior citizen" shall mean a primary named utility 7 service, water service, or telephone service accountholder who (i) is at 8 least sixty-five years of age; and (ii) either (A) has had a total 9 household income of less than fifty thousand dollars for two consecutive 10 income tax years beginning in two thousand twenty, as verified by the 11 department of taxation and finance; or (B) is annually eligible to 12 receive assistance under the emergency rental assistance program (ERAP) 13 or the home energy assistance program (HEAP) and provides proof of 14 eligibility from the agency administering ERAP or HEAP. 15 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately.